Idaho statutes. Title 22 AGRICULTURE AND HORTICULTURE
Chapter 5
SEED POTATOES

Sec.

§ 22-501. Definitions.

When used in this chapter:

“Department” means the department of agriculture of the state of Idaho.

“Certified potatoes” means potatoes certified according to chapter 15, title 22, Idaho Code, the seed and plant certification act or a similar act of another state or country.

“Director” means the director of the Idaho department of agriculture.

“Distribute” means to offer for sale, sell, barter or otherwise supply potatoes or to supply, furnish or otherwise provide potatoes to a person.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, firm, association or agent.

“Potatoes” means potatoes (Solanum tuberosum) that may be sold for or used as seed potatoes.

History.

1939, ch. 144, p. 261, no section number; am. 1996, ch. 215, § 1, p. 700; am. 2000, ch. 141, § 1, p. 369.

§ 22-502. Packing and tagging.

All potatoes sold or offered for sale as “Idaho certified seed potatoes” must be packed, tagged and sealed in accordance with the Idaho rules of certification as authorized under chapter 15, title 22, Idaho Code.

History.

1939, ch. 144, § 2, p. 261; am. 1965, ch. 6, § 1, p. 8; am. 1996, ch. 215, § 2, p. 700.

§ 22-503. Potatoes for planting.

All potatoes offered for sale, sold or delivered under contract or distributed into or within the state of Idaho for planting in the state of Idaho by any person from any state, territory, or country shall be certified and shall be accompanied by a certificate of inspection and a plant health certificate, and shall include the description of the grade, the findings of all inspections of each lot of seed, noting the name and amount of any disease observed, and generation of the potatoes and shall show that the potatoes were packed, sealed, and tagged under the certification standards of the state, territory, or country in which they were produced. Seed being imported into Idaho shall meet or exceed the Idaho certification standards for certified seed potatoes according to the Idaho rules of certification as authorized under chapter 15, title 22, Idaho Code. Imported seed lots that exceed tolerances for that specific generation required for Idaho seed, shall be downgraded to the next acceptable generation tolerances until rejection. Potatoes imported from any other state, country, or territory shall be certified and also be in compliance with other applicable rules of the department pertaining to potatoes.

Idaho growers shall be allowed to plant uncertified potatoes grown by them as a part of their farming operation provided that they are no more than one (1) generation from their own certified parent seed potatoes. Uncertified potatoes planted by Idaho growers as provided for under this section must comply with all testing and any other conditions as set forth under this chapter and any rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

History.

1939, ch. 144, § 3, p. 261; am. 1971, ch. 118, § 1, p. 401; am. 1979, ch. 181, § 1, p. 535; am. 1996, ch. 215, § 3, p. 700; am. 2000, ch. 141, § 2, p. 369; am. 2003, ch. 108, § 1, p. 346.

§ 22-504. Penalty for violations.

Any person who violates or fails to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than ten dollars ($10.00) per hundred weight of potatoes in violation or be imprisoned in the county jail for not more than six (6) months or be subject to both such fine and imprisonment.

Any person who violates or fails to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter or any rules promulgated under this chapter may be assessed a civil penalty by the department or its duly authorized agent of not more than ten dollars ($10.00) per hundred weight of potatoes in violation for each offense and shall be liable for reasonable attorney’s fees. Assessment of a civil penalty may be made in conjunction with any other department administrative action. No civil penalty may be assessed unless the person charged was given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. If the department is unable to collect such penalty or if any person fails to pay all or a set portion of the civil penalty as determined by the department, it may recover such amount by action in the appropriate district court. Any person against whom the department has assessed a civil penalty under the provisions of this chapter may, within thirty (30) days of the final action by the agency making the assessment, appeal the assessment to the district court of the county in which the violation is alleged by the department to have occurred. Moneys collected for violations shall be remitted to the agricultural [agriculture department] inspection account.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the director to report minor violations for prosecution when he believes that the public interest will be best served by suitable warnings or other administrative action.

History.

1939, ch. 144, § 4, p. 261; am. 1996, ch. 215, § 4, p. 700.

§ 22-505. Rules.

The department is hereby authorized to promulgate rules that may be necessary for the efficient enforcement of the provisions of this chapter including, but not limited to, requirements for planting, testing, sampling, inspection, and compliance verification procedures. The department may by rules, establish a schedule of fees for services performed by the department in the administration of the rules. Receipts of these fees shall be deposited in the agricultural inspections account [agriculture department inspection account] created pursuant to section 22-105 [22-104], Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-505, as added by 1996, ch. 215, § 5, p. 700.

§ 22-506. Advisory committee.

In order to maintain close contact between the department and the potato industry there is hereby established an advisory committee to be appointed by the director. Any person or organization recognized by the potato industry may provide a nomination list of no more than two (2) individuals to the director. The committee shall be comprised of no more than twelve (12) individuals, one (1) of whom must be from the university of Idaho, and one (1) from the department.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-506, as added by 1996, ch. 215, § 6, p. 700.

§ 22-507. Crop management areas.

Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted in such a manner as to interfere with the enforcement or implementation of provisions of section 22-2017, Idaho Code, crop management areas, or rules promulgated thereunder.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-507, as added by 1996, ch. 215, § 7, p. 700; am. 2007, ch. 51, § 1, p. 123.

§ 22-508. Exemptions.

Upon application to the director, potato plantings of one (1) acre or less per variety are exempted from the certification requirements of this chapter. However, such plantings may at the discretion of the director be subject to any laboratory testing or field inspections as provided for by rule, at the owner’s expense.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-508, as added by 1996, ch. 215, § 8, p. 700.

§ 22-509. Title.

This chapter shall be known as: “The Idaho Seed Potato Act of 1996.”

History.

I.C.,§ 22-509, as added by 1996, ch. 215, § 9, p. 700.

§ 22-510. Seed potato arbitration.

Requirement of arbitration. When any buyer claims to have been damaged by the failure of seed potatoes to perform as represented, or when any buyer claims to have been damaged by the failure of any seed potato to produce or perform as represented by the required label to be attached to such seed as prescribed in rules, or by warranty, or as a result of negligence, the buyer shall submit the claim to arbitration as provided in this section.

Notice of required arbitration. In addition to the certification tag required under section 22-502, Idaho Code, conspicuous language calling attention to the requirement for arbitration under this section shall be referenced or included on a notice of required arbitration tag, or otherwise attached to the seed bag or package. A notice in the following form, or equivalent language, shall be sufficient.